Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-129
Dundy.

The county of Dundy is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of the state; thence east to the southeast corner of township one, north, of range thirty-six; thence north to the northeast corner of township four, north, of range thirty-six; thence west to the west boundary line of the State of Nebraska; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 66, p. 225;

R.S.1913, § 842;

C.S.1922, § 744;

C.S.1929, § 25-131;

R.S.1943, § 22-129.